Wisconsin, session 2025, AB453.
do enact as follows:AB453,11Section 1. 59.69 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB453,2,16259.69 (3) (a) The county zoning agency may direct the preparation of a county 3development plan or parts of the plan for the physical development of the 4unincorporated territory within the county and areas within incorporated 5jurisdictions whose governing bodies by resolution agree to having their areas 6included in the county’s development plan. The plan may be adopted in whole or in 7part and may be amended by the board and endorsed by the governing bodies of 8incorporated jurisdictions included in the plan. The county development plan, in 9whole or in part, in its original form or as amended, is hereafter referred to as the 10development plan. To the extent that the development plan applies to 11unincorporated areas of a county with the population described in s. 60.23 (34), it 12applies only to those unincorporated areas that are subject to county zoning. 13Beginning on January 1, 2010, or, if the county is exempt under s. 66.1001 (3m), the 14date under s. 66.1001 (3m) (b), if the county engages in any program or action 15described in s. 66.1001 (3), the development plan shall contain at least all of the 16elements specified in s. 66.1001 (2).AB453,217Section 2. 62.23 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB453,3,161862.23 (3) (b) The commission may adopt the master plan as a whole by a 19single resolution, or, as the work of making the whole master plan progresses, may 20from time to time by resolution adopt a part or parts of a master plan. Beginning on 1January 1, 2010, or, if the city is exempt under s. 66.1001 (3m), the date under s. 266.1001 (3m) (b), if the city engages in any program or action described in s. 66.1001 3(3), the master plan shall contain at least all of the elements specified in s. 66.1001 4(2). The adoption of the plan or any part, amendment, or addition, shall be by 5resolution carried by the affirmative votes of not less than a majority of all the 6members of the city plan commission. The resolution shall refer expressly to the 7elements under s. 66.1001 and other matters intended by the commission to form 8the whole or any part of the plan, and the action taken shall be recorded on the 9adopted plan or part of the plan by the identifying signature of the secretary of the 10commission, and a copy of the plan or part of the plan shall be certified to the 11common council, and also to the commanding officer, or the officer’s designee, of any 12military base or installation, with at least 200 assigned military personnel or that 13contains at least 2,000 acres, that is located in or near the city. The purpose and 14effect of the adoption and certifying of the master plan or part of the plan shall be 15solely to aid the city plan commission and the council in the performance of their 16duties.AB453,317Section 3. 66.1001 (1) (am) of the statutes is repealed.AB453,418Section 4. 66.1001 (2) (h) of the statutes is renumbered 66.1001 (2) (h) 19(intro.) and amended to read:AB453,4,32066.1001 (2) (h) Land-use element. (intro.) A compilation of objectives, 21policies, goals, maps, and programs to guide the future development and 22redevelopment of public and private property. In this paragraph, determinations of 23the net density of lands shall exclude only those portions of the lands that are 24wetlands, that are included in a 100-year floodplain, or that are owned by the 1federal government, a local governmental unit, as defined in s. 20.931 (1) (a), or a 2state agency, as defined in s. 20.931 (1) (c), and are not intended for redevelopment. 3The element shall contain do all of the following:AB453,4,741. Contain a listing of the amount, type, intensity, and net density of existing 5uses of land in the local governmental unit, such as agricultural, residential, 6commercial, industrial, and other public and private uses. The element shall 7analyzeAB453,4,1082. Analyze trends in the supply, demand, and price of land, opportunities for 9redevelopment, and existing and potential land-use conflicts. The element shall 10containAB453,4,15113. Contain projections, based on the background information specified in par. 12(a), for 20 years, in 5-year increments, of future residential, agricultural, 13commercial, and industrial land uses including the assumptions of net densities or 14other spatial assumptions upon which the projections are based. The element shall 15also includeAB453,4,22165. Include a series of maps that shows current land uses and future land uses 17that indicate productive agricultural soils, natural limitations for building site 18development, floodplains, wetlands and other environmentally sensitive lands, the 19boundaries of areas to which services of public utilities and community facilities, as 20those terms are used in par. (d), will be provided in the future, consistent with the 21timetable described in par. (d), and the general location of future land uses by net 22density or other classifications.AB453,523Section 5. 66.1001 (2) (h) 4. of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab453 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab453 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB453 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB453 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB453: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting